Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 18. Short-term Loans.
§ 6.2-1816.1.
Loan terms and conditions.

A licensee may engage in the business of making short-term loans, provided that each loan meets all of the following conditions:

The total amount of the loan does not exceed $2,500.

The minimum duration of the loan is four months and the maximum duration of the loan is 24 months; however, the minimum duration of the loan may be less than four months if the total monthly payment on the loan does not exceed the greater of (i) an amount that is five percent of the borrower’s verified gross monthly income or (ii) six percent of the borrower’s verified net monthly income.

The loan is made pursuant to a written loan contract that sets forth the terms and conditions of the loan, which shall be signed by the borrower and a person authorized by the licensee to sign such agreements and dated the same day the loan is made and disbursed. A copy of the signed loan contract shall be provided to the borrower. The loan contract shall disclose in a clear and concise manner all of the following:

The principal amount of the loan and the total amount of fees and charges the borrower will be required to pay in connection with the loan pursuant to the loan contract;

The amount of each payment of principal and interest, when each payment is due, the total number of payments that the borrower will be required to make under the loan contract, and the loan’s maturity date;

If the licensee receives a check as security for the loan, evidence of receipt from the borrower of a check, stating the amount of the check and terms upon which the check may be presented for payment;

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, that informs the borrower that complaints regarding the loan or lender may be submitted to the Bureau and includes the correct telephone number, website address, and mailing address for the Bureau;

Any disclosures required under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time;

The annual percentage rate;

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, as follows: “This loan is made pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia. You have the right to rescind or cancel this loan by returning the loan proceeds check or the originally contracted loan amount by 5 p.m. of the third business day immediately following the day you enter into this contract.”;

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, as follows: “Electronic payment is optional. You have the right to revoke or remove your authorization for electronic payment at any time.”;

The borrower’s mailing address.

Such other information relating to the loan as the Commission shall determine, by regulation, is necessary to ensure that the borrower is provided adequate notice of the relevant provisions of the loan.

The loan is a precomputed loan and is payable in substantially equal installments consisting of principal, fees, and interest combined. For purposes of this section, “precomputed loan” means a loan in which the debt is a sum comprising the principal amount and the amount of fees and interest computed in advance on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due.

The loan may be rescinded or canceled on or before 5 p.m. of the third business day immediately following the day of the loan transaction upon the borrower returning the original loan proceeds check or paying to the licensee, in the form of cash or other good funds instrument, the loan proceeds.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1817.
Authorized fees and charges.

A licensee may charge, collect, and receive only the following fees and charges in connection with a short-term loan, provided such fees and charges are set forth in the written loan contract described in §

6.2-1816.1

:

Interest at a simple annual rate not to exceed 36 percent;

Subject to §

6.2-1817.1

, a monthly maintenance fee that does not exceed the lesser of eight percent of the originally contracted loan amount or $25, provided the fee is not added to the loan balance on which interest is charged;

Any deposit item return fee incurred by the licensee, not to exceed $25, if a borrower’s check or electronic draft is returned because the account on which it was drawn was closed by the borrower or contained insufficient funds, or the borrower stopped payment of the check or electronic draft, provided that the terms and conditions upon which such fee will be charged to the borrower are set forth in the written loan contract described in §

6.2-1816.1

; and

Damages and costs to which the licensee may become entitled to by law in connection with any civil action to collect a loan after default, except that the total amount of damages and costs shall not exceed the originally contracted loan amount.

A licensee may impose a late charge according to the provisions of §

6.2-400

provided, however, that the late charge shall not exceed $20.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-460; 2008, cc. 849, 876; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For article, “Borrowing in the Shadow of Death: Another Look at Probate Lending,” see 59 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2447 (2018).

§ 6.2-1817.1.
Inflation adjustment of maximum monthly maintenance fee.

The Commission may, from time to time, by regulation, adjust the dollar amount of $25 specified in subsection A of §

6.2-1817

to reflect the rate of inflation from the previous date that the dollar amount was established, as measured by the Consumer Price Index or other method of measuring the rate of inflation that the Commission determines is reliable and generally accepted.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1818.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

6.2-1818

, which limited charges in addition to the interest and fees allowed by §

6.2-1817

, derived from 2002, c. 897, § 6.1-461; 2004, c. 295; 2008, cc. 849, 876; 2010, c. 794.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1818.1.
Refinancing of short-term loans.

Subject to subsection F of §

6.2-1818.2

, a licensee may refinance a short-term loan, provided that the refinanced loan is also a short-term loan.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1818.2.
Statement of balance due; repayment and refunds.

The licensee shall, upon the request of the borrower or his agent, provide a statement of balance due on a short-term loan.

A borrower shall be permitted to make partial payments, in increments of not less than $5, on the loan at any time prior to maturity, without charge. The licensee shall give the borrower dated receipts for each payment made, which shall state the updated balance due on the loan.

When providing a statement of balance due on the loan, the licensee shall state the amount required to discharge the borrower’s obligation in full as of the date the notice is provided and for each of the next three business days following that date. If the licensee cannot reasonably supply a firm statement of balance due when requested or required, the licensee may provide a good faith estimate of the balance due immediately and provide to the borrower or his agent a firm statement of balance due within two business days.

The licensee shall provide any statement of balance due verbally and in writing, and shall not fail to provide the information by phone upon the request of the borrower or his agent.

A licensee shall not fail to accept cash or other good funds instrument from the borrower, or a third party when submitted on behalf of the borrower, for repayment of a short-term loan in full or in part. Payments shall be credited by the licensee on the date received.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a short-term loan is prepaid in full or refinanced prior to the loan’s maturity date, the licensee shall refund to the borrower a prorated portion of fees and charges based on a ratio of the number of days the loan was outstanding and the number of days for which the loan was originally contracted. For purposes of this section, all charges made in connection with the loan shall be included when calculating the loan charges except for deposit item return fees and late charges authorized under §

6.2-1817

.

If a licensee presents a check held as security for a loan, the licensee shall refund any amount received that is in excess of the payment due on the loan as of the day the licensee presents the check. For purposes of this subsection, the payment due on the loan shall be no more than the amount of unpaid payments and fees that have already come due according to the loan contract or, if applicable, the amount due according to a valid contractual acceleration clause or demand feature as described in subdivision 23 of §

6.2-1816

.

The licensee shall provide any refund due to a borrower in the form of cash or business check as soon as reasonably possible and not later than two business days after receiving payment from the borrower.

Upon repayment of the loan in full, the licensee shall mark the original loan agreement with the word “paid” or “canceled,” return it to the borrower, and retain a copy in its records.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1818.3.
Restriction on certain fees and charges.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a licensee shall not contract for, charge, collect, or receive in connection with a short-term loan a total amount of fees and charges that exceeds either (i) 50 percent of the originally contracted loan amount, if the originally contracted loan amount was $1,500 or less or (ii) 60 percent of the originally contracted loan amount, if the originally contracted loan amount was greater than $1,500. For purposes of this section, all charges made in connection with the loan shall be included when calculating the total loan charges except for deposit item return fees and late charges authorized under §

6.2-1817

.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1818.4.
Verification of borrower’s income.

Before initiating a short-term loan transaction with a borrower, a licensee shall make a reasonable attempt to verify the borrower’s income. At a minimum, the licensee shall obtain from the borrower one or more recent pay stubs or other written evidence of recurring income, such as a bank statement. The written evidence shall include at least one document that, when presented to the licensee, is dated not earlier than 45 days prior to the borrower’s initiation of the short-term loan transaction.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-1819.
Advertising.

No person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter shall use or cause to be published any advertisement that (i) contains any false, misleading or deceptive statement or representation; or (ii) identifies the person by any name other than the name set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

Any advertising materials used to promote short-term loans that includes the amount of any payment, expressed either as a percentage or dollar amount, or the amount of any finance charge, shall also include a statement of the interest, fees and charges, expressed as an annual percentage rate, payable using examples of a $300 loan repaid in three months, a $500 loan repaid in five months, and a $1,000 loan repaid in 10 months.

In any print media advertisement, including any website, used to promote short-term loans, the disclosure statements described in subsection B shall be conspicuous. “Conspicuous” shall have the meaning set forth in subdivision (a)(14) of § 59.1-501.2. If a single advertisement consists of multiple pages, folds, or faces, the disclosure requirement applies only to one page, fold, or face. In a television advertisement used to promote short-term loans, the visual disclosure legend shall include 20 scan lines in size. In a radio advertisement or advertisement communicated by telephone used to promote short-term loans, the disclosure statement shall last at least two seconds and the statement shall be spoken so that its contents may be easily understood.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-462; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added subsections B and C.

§ 6.2-1820.
Other business.

No licensee shall conduct the business of making short-term loans under this chapter at any office, suite, room, or other place of business where any other business is solicited or conducted except a registered check cashing business, a motor vehicle title loan business licensed under Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.), or such other business as the Commission determines should be permitted, and subject to such conditions as the Commission deems necessary and in the public interest. No such other business shall be allowed except as permitted by Commission regulation or upon the filing of a written application with the Commission, payment of a $300 fee or other reasonable amount that the Commission may set, and provision of such information as the Commission may deem pertinent. The Commission shall not, however, permit the sale of insurance or the enrolling of borrowers under group insurance policies. This section shall not apply to any other business that is transacted with persons residing solely outside the Commonwealth.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-463; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in the first sentence, substituted “short-term” for “payday” and inserted “a motor vehicle title loan business licensed under Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.)”; in the second sentence, inserted “or other reasonable amount that the Commission may set”; and added the last sentence.

§ 6.2-1821.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter upon any of the following grounds:

Any ground for denial of a license under this chapter;

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or a violation of any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

A course of conduct consisting of the failure to perform written agreements with borrowers;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation or deceit;

Entry of a judgment against the licensee involving fraud, misrepresentation or deceit;

Entry of a federal or state administrative order against such licensee for violation of any law or any regulation applicable to the conduct of his business;

Refusal to permit an investigation or examination by the Commission;

Failure to pay any fee or assessment imposed by this chapter; or

Failure to comply with any order of the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, acts of any officer, director, member, partner, or principal shall be deemed acts of the licensee.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-464; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1822.
Cease and desist orders.

If the Commission determines that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted hereunder, the Commission may, upon 21 days’ notice in writing, order such person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the provisions of this chapter. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such person or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not issue a cease and desist order except based upon findings made at such hearing. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Title 12.1. The Commission may enforce compliance with any such order issued under this section by imposition and collection of such fines and penalties as may be prescribed by law.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-465; 2003, c. 593; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1823.
Notice of proposed suspension or revocation.

The Commission shall not revoke or suspend the license of any licensee upon any of the grounds set forth in §

6.2-1821

until it has given the licensee 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed revocation or suspension and an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of the licensee or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state with particularity the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not suspend or revoke the license except based upon findings made at such hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Title 12.1.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-466; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1824.
Civil penalties.

In addition to the authority conferred under §§

6.2-1821

and

6.2-1822

, the Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $1,000 upon any person who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, the regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the lender’s business. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the civil penalty herein prescribed, and in the case of a violation of §

6.2-1801

, each loan made or arranged shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-467; 2003, c. 593; 2008, cc. 849, 876; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1825.
Criminal penalties.

Any person violating §

6.2-1801

is guilty of a Class 6 felony. For the purposes of this section, each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-468; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-1826.
Validity of noncompliant loan agreement; private right of action.

If any provision of a written loan agreement violates this chapter, such provision shall be unenforceable against the borrower.

Any person who suffers loss by reason of a violation of any provision of this chapter may bring a civil action to enforce such provision. Any person who is successful in such action shall recover reasonable attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court costs incurred by bringing such action.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-469; 2008, cc. 849, 876; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1827.
Application of chapter to Internet loans.

The provisions of this chapter, including specifically the licensure requirements of §

6.2-1801

, shall apply to persons making short-term loans over the Internet to Virginia residents or any individual in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person making the loan maintains a physical presence in the Commonwealth.

The Commission may, from time to time, by administrative rule or policy statement, set requirements that the Commission reasonably deems necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

History.

2008, cc. 849, 876, § 6.1-469.1; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A, substituted “short-term loans” for “payday loans” and inserted “or any individual in the Commonwealth”; and added subsection B.

§ 6.2-1828.
Authority of Attorney General; referral by Commission to Attorney General.

If the Commission determines that a person is in violation of, or has violated, any provision of this chapter, the Commission may refer the information to the Attorney General and may request that the Attorney General investigate such violations. With or without such referral, the Attorney General is authorized to seek to enjoin violations of this chapter. The circuit court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law.

The Attorney General may also seek, and the circuit court may order or decree, damages and such other relief allowed by law, including restitution to the extent available to borrowers under applicable law. Persons entitled to any relief as authorized by this section shall be identified by order of the court within 180 days from the date of the order permanently enjoining the unlawful act or practice.

In any action brought by the Attorney General by virtue of the authority granted in this provision, the Attorney General shall be entitled to seek reasonable attorney fees and costs.

If the Attorney General files an action to enjoin violations of this chapter, the Attorney General shall give notice of such action to the Commission.

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-470; 2010, c. 794; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A, substituted “With or without” for “Upon” in the second sentence; in subsection B, substituted “The Attorney General” for “Upon such referral by the Commission, the Attorney General” in the first sentence; and added subsection D.

§ 6.2-1829.
Violation of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice in accordance with § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.

2002, c. 897, § 6.1-471; 2010, c. 794.